Ohio, session 136, SB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5516.03 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 5516.03. The director of transportation shall adopt, amend, and enforce rules, consistent with the customary use of outdoor advertising, the safety of the traveling public, and national policy as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Such rules may include, but shall not be limited to, sizing, lighting, spacing, and such other conditions as may be necessary to promote the safety of the traveling public and effect the national policy. The Any rule adopted by the director governing spacing criteria shall require the minimum distance between an advertising device and an interchange or proposed interchange of a highway on the interstate system or primary system to be four hundred feet. The rules shall be in addition to the provisions of municipal ordinances regulating advertising devices and shall not invalidate the provisions of any municipal ordinance that are equivalent to and consistent with the rules adopted by the director under this section. The director shall furnish a copy of such rules, without charge, to any person making a request therefor. Section 2. That existing section 5516.03 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.